Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska90-106
State symbol and slogan; use by state agencies; imprint on state stationery.

The official slogan and official symbol, either separately or in conjunction with each other, shall be used by all agencies of the state whenever appropriate in the promotion of the state. They shall be imprinted on all state letterheads and the reverse side of all mailing envelopes as new supplies are acquired.

Laws 1963, c. 533, § 3, p. 1678;

R.R.S.1943, § 84-716.03.